District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1105

Appointment and qualifications of physicians; examination; certificate

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604a1, 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1102 to 21-1108A.